Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2101.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) A city or county shall not adopt or enforce an
ordinance or resolution, respectively, that establishes or provides for the
operation of a guaranteed income program that uses tax revenue unless
the legislature expressly consents to and approves of such program by
an act of the legislature.
(b) Any ordinance or resolution prohibited by subsection (a) that
was adopted prior to July 1, 2025, shall be null and void.
(c) As used in this section, "guaranteed income program" means a
program that is not expressly required by federal law or regulation and
provides individuals with a regular periodic cash payment.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and passed
that body
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
______________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
__________________________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.